Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-203 Confidentiality of hearings.
In all proceedings and judicial reviews thereof under section 431:15-201 and
section 431:15-202, all records of the insurer, other documents, and all files,
court records, and papers of the insurance division of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, so far as they pertain to or are a part of the
record of the proceedings, shall be and remain confidential except as is
necessary to obtain compliance therewith, unless the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit of this State, after hearing arguments from the parties in
chambers, orders otherwise, or unless the insurer requests that the matter be
made public. Until the court order, all papers filed with the court shall be
confidential. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Section establishes a duty governing the conduct of the
insurance commissioner and court personnel who are involved in investigations
conducted by the commissioner and cannot form a basis for the imposition of
liability upon third parties who may inadvertently come into possession of
material deemed "confidential" pursuant to this section's terms. 89
H. 254, 971 P.2d 1089.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next